District of Columbia statutes.
29-609.06

Nonexclusive.

This subchapter shall not be exclusive. Partnerships may merge or engage in interest exchanges in any other manner provided or permitted by law.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-159.9.
2001 Ed., § 33-109.09.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 909 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).